Utah statutes.
58-76-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Professional Geologist Licensing Board created in
Section 58-76-201.
(2)  "Geology" means the science, which treats the study of the earth in
general, the earth's processes and history, investigation of the earth's crust
and the rocks and other materials of which it is composed, and the applied
science of utilizing knowledge of the earth's history, processes, constituent
rocks, minerals, liquids, gases, and other materials for the use of mankind.
(3)  "Practice of geology before the public" means the performance of geology
including but not limited to consultation, investigation, evaluation,
planning, geologic mapping, interpretation of geologic data, preparation of
geologic reports, geologic cross-sections and geologic maps, inspection of
geological work, and the responsible supervision thereof, the performance of
which is relevant to public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health,
property, and the environment, except as otherwise specifically provided by
this chapter.
(4)  "Professional geologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of geology before the public.
(5)  "Responsible charge" means the independent control and direction by use
of initiative, skill, and independent judgment of geological work or the
supervision of the work.
(6)  "Subordinate" means any individual who practices geology or assists a
professional geologist in the practice of geology before the public without
assuming the responsible charge for the work.
(7)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-76-501.
(8)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Section 58-1-501 and as may be
further defined by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.
